West Virginia, session 2026, HB4270.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-12E-7 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 4, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (select plant-based derivatives and select plant-based derivative products of hemp and kratom, 61 CSR 30), is authorized.